Hawaii statutes.
§662-14 Exclusiveness of remedy. The
authority of the State or any state agency to sue and be sued in its own name
shall not be construed to authorize any other actions against the State or such
agency on claims for torts of its employees, and the rights and remedies
provided by this chapter and section 661-11 shall be exclusive. [L 1957, c 312,
pt of §1; Supp, §245A-14; HRS §662-14; am L 1972, c 164, §2(d)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next